test/src/morphology/V-maksw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - maksõ: # Verb 25 'eng /est maksta/fin' - full paradigm
     maksõ+V+Inf: maksõ
     maksõ+V+Ger: maksõs
     maksõ+V+Sup: maksām
     maksõ+V+Sup+Ine: maksāmõs
     maksõ+V+Sup+Ela: maksāmõst
     maksõ+V+Sup+Tra: maksāmõks
     maksõ+V+Sup+Abe: maksāmõt
     maksõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maksāb
     maksõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: maksāt
     maksõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: maksābõd
     maksõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: maksīz
     maksõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [maksīzt, maksīztõ]
     maksõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [maksīzt, maksīztõ]
     maksõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: maks
     maksõ+V+Cond+Sg3: maksāks
     maksõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: maksā
     maksõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: maksõ
     maksõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: maksāgid
     maksõ+V+Jus+Sg3: maksāg
     maksõ+V+QuoSg3: maksāji
     maksõ+V+ActPrfPrc: maksõn
     maksõ+V+PssPrfPrc: makstõd
